District of Columbia statutes.
47-1017

Corcoran Gallery of Art — Endowment fund.

All property held as endowment fund by the trustees of the Corcoran Gallery of Art, in the City of Washington, District of Columbia, for the purpose of revenue to support said institution, shall be, and the same is hereby, declared exempt from all taxation and assessments by the municipal authorities or by the United States so long as the same shall be so held.

Jan. 26, 1887, 24 Stat. 364, ch. 43
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1017.
1973 Ed., § 47-810.